Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1250
Vessel; exempt from numbering by commission rule and regulation.

The commission may by rule and regulation exempt a vessel from numbering under the State Boat Act after the commission has found that the numbering of certain vessels will not materially aid in their safety and identification.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 50;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 120.